Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-2602
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(1) School boards develop policies to facilitate reading instruction and intervention services to address student reading needs, including, but not limited to, dyslexia;

(2) All teachers for kindergarten through grade three should be effective reading teachers as evidenced by (a) evaluations based on classroom observations and student improvement on reading assessments or (b) specialized training in reading improvement;

(3) Each student and his or her parents or guardians be informed of the student's reading progress; and

(4) Each student in a public school be able to read at or above grade level by third grade.

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 21.